Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB386.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 424.260 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except where a statute specifically fixes a larger sum as the minimum for a
requirement of advertisement for bids, a[no] city, county, or district, or board or
commission of a city or county, or sheriff or county clerk, shall not[may] make a
contract, lease, or other agreement for:
(a) Materials;
(b) Supplies, except perishable foods such as meat, poultry, fish, egg products,
fresh vegetables, and fresh fruits;
(c) Equipment, except vehicles and equipment installed in the vehicle; or
(d) Contractual services other than professional;
involving an expenditure of more than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000)[forty
thousand dollars ($40,000)] without first making newspaper advertisement or by
using the alternative publication procedures set out in Section 2 of this Act for
bids. This subsection shall not apply to the transfer of property between
governmental agencies as authorized in KRS 82.083(4)(a).
(2) If the fiscal court requires that the sheriff or county clerk advertise for bids on
expenditures of less than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000)[forty thousand dollars
($40,000)], the fiscal court requirement shall prevail.
(3) (a) Nothing in this statute shall limit or restrict the ability of a local school district
to acquire supplies and equipment outside of the bidding procedure if those
supplies and equipment meet the specifications of the contracts awarded by
the Office of Material and Procurement Services in the Office of the
Controller within the Finance and Administration Cabinet or a federal, local,
or cooperative agency and are available for purchase elsewhere at a lower
price. A board of education may purchase those supplies and equipment
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/6/2025 9:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1483
without advertising for bids if, prior to making the purchases, the board of
education obtains certification from the district's finance or purchasing officer
that the items to be purchased meet the standards and specifications fixed by
state price contract, federal (GSA) price contract, or the bid of another school
district whose bid specifications allow other districts to utilize their bids, and
that the sales price is lower than that established by the various price contract
agreements or available through the bid of another school district whose bid
specifications would allow the district to utilize their bid.
(b) The procedures set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be
available to the district for any specific item once the bidding procedure has
been initiated by an invitation to bid and a publication of specifications for
that specific item has been published. In the event that all bids are rejected,
the district may again avail itself of the provisions of paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(4) This requirement shall not apply in an emergency if the chief executive officer of
the city, county, or district has duly certified that an emergency exists, and has filed
a copy of the certificate with the chief financial officer of the city, county, or
district, or if the sheriff or the county clerk has certified that an emergency exists,
and has filed a copy of the certificate with the clerk of the court where his necessary
office expenses are fixed pursuant to KRS 64.345 or 64.530, or if the
superintendent of the board of education has duly certified that an emergency
exists, and has filed a copy of the certificate with the chief state school officer.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply for the purchase of
wholesale electric power for resale to the ultimate customers of a municipal utility
organized under KRS 96.550 to 96.900.
(6) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to purchases for products or services
made pursuant to KRS 82.084.
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/6/2025 9:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1483
Section 2. KRS 424.145 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local government" means any:
1. [Any ]Urban-county government;
2. [Any ]Consolidated local government;
3. [Any ]Charter county;
4. [Any ]Unified local government;[ and]
5. [In Any ]County;[ containing a population of eighty thousand (80,000)
or more based upon the most recent federal decennial census, the county
itself or any:]
6.[a.] City[ within the county];
7.[b.] Special district[ within the county];
8.[c.] School district; and[ within the county; or]
9.[d.] Special purpose governmental entity[ within the county]; and
(b) "Notice website" means a website that is maintained by a local government or
a third party under contract with the local government, which contains links to
the legal advertisements or notices electronically published by the local
government.
(2) Local governments may satisfy the requirements of this chapter or any other
provision of law requiring the publication of an advertisement in a newspaper by
following the alternative procedures established in this section.
(3) In lieu of newspaper publication, a local government may post the required
advertisement online on a notice website operated by the local government that is
accessible to the public at all times in accordance with subsections (4) to (9) of this
section. Publication of an advertisement shall be deemed to have occurred on the
date the advertisement is posted on the local government's notice website.
(4) (a) In conjunction with an alternative internet posting, the local government shall
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/6/2025 9:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1483
publish a newspaper advertisement one (1) time providing notice that the
public may view the full advertisement on the notice website. The newspaper
advertisement shall:
1. Be not more than six (6) column inches and meet the technical
requirements of KRS 424.160(1);
2. Be published within ten (10) days of the alternative posting on the notice
website when the purpose of the posting is to inform the public of a
completed act, including those acts specified in KRS 424.130(1)(a), or
within three (3) days of the posting when the purpose of the posting is to
inform the public of the right to take a certain action, including the
events specified in KRS 424.130(1)(b) and (d);
3. Inform the public of the subject matter of the alternative posting, inform
the public of its right to inspect any documents associated with the
internet posting by contacting the local government, and provide a
mailing and a physical address where a copy of the document may be
obtained and the web address if the document is available online; and
4. Provide the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the notice website
address and the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the address
where the full advertisement may be directly viewed along with a
telephone number for the local government.
(b) A local government may, alternatively, publish an advertisement one (1) time
providing notice that the public may view the full advertisement on the notice
website in a digital newspaper that meets the qualifications discussed in KRS
424.120, so long as the advertisement complies with paragraph (a)2.,[(a) 2.,]
3., and 4. of this subsection.
(5) In addition to specific legal requirements applicable to a particular type of
advertisement:
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/6/2025 9:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1483
(a) The contents of each alternative internet posting shall meet the minimum
requirements of KRS 424.140; and
(b) The local government shall make the alternative internet posting in
accordance with the times and periods established by KRS 424.130, and shall
actively maintain the alternative internet posting on its public website:
1. Until the deadline passes or the event occurs if the substance of the
advertisement is intended to advise the public of a time to take action or
the occurrence of a future event;
2. For at least ninety (90) days if the substance of the advertisement is to
inform the public of an action taken by the local government, such as the
enactment of an ordinance; or
3. For one (1) year or until updated or replaced with a more recent version
if the substance of the advertisement is intended to inform the public
about the financial status of the local government, such as annual audits
or the budget.
(6) The local government shall display access to any and all alternative internet
postings made pursuant to this section prominently on the homepage or first page of
the notice website. The section of the notice website containing any postings and
the actual advertisement shall be made in a manner where the public can readily and
with minimal effort identify the location of and easily retrieve the advertisements.
(7) The local government shall provide a conspicuous statement on its notice website
that individuals who have difficulty in accessing the contents of posted
advertisements may contact the local government for information regarding
alternative methods of accessing advertisements, which shall include the telephone
number of the local government.
(8) As proof of an alternative internet posting to satisfy any newspaper publication
requirement, the local government shall memorialize the posting by capturing the
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/6/2025 9:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1483
posting in electronic or paper format and shall complete an affidavit signed by the
person responsible for causing publications under KRS 424.150, stating that the
local government satisfied the publication requirement by alternative internet
posting. The affidavit shall specify the active dates of the notice website posting,
the specific statutory requirements being satisfied by the alternative internet
posting, and the notice website address where the alternative posting was located,
including the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) used for the posting. The local
government shall retain the captured posting and the affidavit by the person
responsible for publication for a period of three (3) years. Together, the captured
posting and the affidavit shall constitute prima facie evidence that the posting was
made and occurred as stated within the affidavit.
(9) The failure to cause the newspaper advertisement required in subsection (4) of this
section shall not void the action of the local government or negate the enforceability
of the matter advertised by alternative internet posting. Any person who violates the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section shall be subject to the penalties
provided in KRS 424.990.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/6/2025 9:32 AM Jacketed